src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-extras_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jeäll u-stem dlo: # Noun - full paradigm
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom: jeäll

#pieʹllrääʹjj ʹpuoliväliʹ
     pieʹllrääʹjj+N+Sg+Nom: pieʹllrääʹjj
     pieʹllrääʹjj+N+Sg+Gen: pieʹllrääʹj
     pieʹllrääʹjj+N+Sg+Ill: pieʹllräjja
     pieʹllrääʹjj+N+Sg+Loc: pieʹllrääʹjest
     pieʹllrääʹjj+N+Sg+Com:  pieʹllraaʹjin
#riipâs ʹetanaʹ
     riipâs+N+Sg+Nom: riipâs 
     riipâs+N+Sg+Gen: rijppâz
     riipâs+N+Sg+Ill: rijppsa
     riipâs+N+Sg+Loc: rijppsest
#žaaʹll ʹsääliʹ
     žaaʹll+N+Sg+Nom: žaaʹll
     žaaʹll+N+Sg+Gen: žaaʹl
     žaaʹll+N+Sg+Ill: žaʹlle
     žaaʹll+N+Sg+Loc: žaaʹlest
#ukksõs ʹetikkaʹ
     ukksõs+N+Sg+Nom: ukksõs
     ukksõs+N+Sg+Gen: ukksõõzz
     ukksõs+N+Sg+Ill: ukksõʹsse
     ukksõs+N+Sg+Loc: ukksõõzzâst
# käʹšnnʼneǩ ʹkassanhoitajaʹ
     käʹšnnʼneǩ+N+Sg+Nom: käʹšnnʼneǩ 
     käʹšnnʼneǩ+N+Sg+Gen: käʹšnnʼneeʹǩǩ
     käʹšnnʼneǩ+N+Sg+Ill: käʹšnnʼnekka
     käʹšnnʼneǩ+N+Sg+Loc: käʹšnnʼneeʹǩǩest
     käʹšnnʼneǩ+N+Pl+Gen: [käʹšnnʼniiʹǩǩi, käʹšnnʼneeʹǩǩi]
